Wisconsin, session 2025, AB275.
do enact as follows:AB275,14Section 1. 20.865 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB275,2,6520.865 (1) (a) Judgments and legal expenses. A sum sufficient to pay for legal 6expenses under s. 59.32 (3), for costs under ss. 227.40, 227.485, and 814.245 and for 1the costs of judgments, orders and settlements of actions, appeals and complaints 2under subch. II of ch. 111 or subch. II or III of ch. 230, and those judgments, awards, 3orders and settlements under ss. 165.25 (6), 321.42, 775.04, and 895.46 that are not 4otherwise reimbursable as liability costs under par. (fm). Release of moneys under 5this paragraph pursuant to any settlement agreement, whether or not incorporated 6into an order, is subject to approval of the attorney general.AB275,27Section 2. 20.865 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB275,2,17820.865 (1) (g) Judgments and legal expenses; program revenues. From the 9appropriate program revenue and program revenue — service accounts, a sum 10sufficient to pay for legal expenses under s. 59.32 (3), for costs under ss. 227.40, 11227.485, and 814.245 and for the cost of judgments, orders and settlements of 12actions, appeals and complaints under subch. II of ch. 111 or subch. II or III of ch. 13230, and those judgments, awards, orders and settlements under ss. 165.25 (6), 14321.42, 775.04, and 895.46 that are not otherwise reimbursable as liability costs 15under par. (fm). Release of moneys under this paragraph pursuant to any 16settlement agreement, whether or not incorporated into an order, is subject to 17approval of the attorney general.AB275,318Section 3. 20.865 (1) (q) of the statutes is amended to read:AB275,3,41920.865 (1) (q) Judgments and legal expenses; segregated revenues. From the 20appropriate segregated funds, a sum sufficient to pay for legal expenses under s. 2159.32 (3), for costs under ss. 227.40, 227.485, and 814.245 and for the cost of 22judgments, orders and settlements of actions, appeals and complaints under subch. 23II of ch. 111 or subch. II or III of ch. 230, and those judgments, awards, orders and 1settlements under ss. 165.25 (6), 321.42, 775.04, and 895.46 that are not otherwise 2reimbursable as liability costs under par. (fm). Release of moneys under this 3paragraph pursuant to any settlement agreement, whether or not incorporated into 4an order, is subject to approval of the attorney general.AB275,45Section 4. 227.40 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB275,3,176227.40 (4) (a) In any proceeding pursuant to this section for judicial review of 7a rule or guidance document, the court shall declare the rule or guidance document 8invalid if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions or exceeds the statutory 9authority of the agency or was promulgated or adopted without compliance with 10statutory rule-making or adoption procedures and shall award the party asserting 11the invalidity of the rule or guidance document, notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), 12reasonable attorney fees and costs. If the proceeding is a judicial proceeding 13specified in sub. (2), attorney fees and costs awarded under this paragraph shall be 14limited to those associated with the challenge to the validity of the rule or guidance 15document, as the court so determines. If an agency is ordered to pay costs under 16this paragraph, the costs shall be paid from the applicable appropriation under s. 1720.865 (1) (a), (g), or (q).AB275,518Section 5. Initial applicability.AB275,3,2019(1) This act first applies to an action for declaratory judgment commenced on 20the effective date of this subsection.AB275,3,2121